New Jersey, session 221, S871.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a fire instructor enrolled in the Public Employees Retirement System prior to November 1, 2008, and employed by a county on the effective date of this act, P.L.     , c. (C.            ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), who had continuous membership in the retirement system, who performed service in the county as a fire instructor in each calendar year of membership, who received a salary for that position greater than $1,500 annually, and who was a permanent career service employee in the civil service, shall be granted service credit for that period of enrollment and considered eligible for membership and for benefits as a member of the retirement system. b. Any person 2[whose membership in the retirement system was terminated 1or partially terminated1] who was enrolled in the Public Employees Retirement System prior to November 1, 2008 for service in a county as a fire instructor and was notified2 within 1[three] five1 years prior to the effective date of this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), 2[and who otherwise qualifies for membership under subsection a. of this section but for the termination shall be reenrolled in the retirement system 1under the same terms in which they were previously enrolled,1 provided the person repays any contributions and interest that were returned when membership was terminated 1, to reinstate their status prior to any such action terminating or partially terminating the membership1]  that such service as a fire instructor was determined ineligible for enrollment in the retirement system shall be granted service credit for that period of enrollment determined ineligible for membership in the retirement system, provided the person repays any contributions and interest that were returned when it was determined that the person was ineligible for membership in the retirement system2. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.